Washington statutes.
RCW 43.15.010

Duties.

The lieutenant governor has the following duties:

(1) The lieutenant governor serves as president of the senate.

(2) In addition to the events prescribed under the state Constitution, the lieutenant governor performs the duties of the governor when the governor is out of the state pursuant to RCW 43.06.040 and 43.06.050. When the lieutenant governor is called to perform the duties of the governor, he or she is compensated according to RCW 43.03.020.

(3) When delegated to do so under RCW 41.72.030, the lieutenant governor shall award the law enforcement medal of honor during national law enforcement recognition week.

[ 2006 c 317 s 3.]